Mississippi, session 2026, HB1861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 57-114-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-114-9.  Calculation and application of an mFlex tax incentive award.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the total amount of the initial mFlex tax incentive determined and awarded by the authority to the certified applicant shall be calculated by the authority as follows: (a)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the total purchase or sales price, or value, including any installation costs thereof, as applicable, of all manufacturing or processing machinery acquired, leased or otherwise moved into the state following the project certification date to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; plus (b)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, seven percent (7%) of the total purchase or sales price, or value, including any installation costs thereof, as applicable, of all nonmanufacturing equipment, other than tagged over-the-road vehicles, acquired, leased or otherwise moved into the state following the project certification date to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; plus (c)  Subject to paragraph (f) below, two percent (2%) of the total contract price or compensation paid to any contractor pursuant to any construction contract entered into following the project certification date by the qualified business or industry or any affiliate thereof, to construct, build, erect, repair or add to any building, facility, structure or other improvement to real property described in Section 27-65-21(1)(a)(i) to establish and construct the qualified economic development project; plus, if applicable; (d)  To the extent that the average employer wage is equal to or more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the average state or county wage, then an additional fifteen percent (15%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; plus, if applicable; (e)  (i)  To the extent that 1. the qualified economic development project is an enterprise enumerated in Section 57-114-3(x)(i) or (x)(ii); 2. the number of new full-time jobs totals fifty (50) or more; 3. the qualified investment totals Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000) or more; 4. the average employer wage is equal to or more than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the average state or county wage; and 5. all full-time employees are eligible for and offered health insurance coverage funded in whole or at least fifty percent (50%) by the qualified business or industry (or by a leasing company with respect to leased employees), then an additional thirty percent (30%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; or (ii)  To the extent that subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (e) does not apply, but 1. the number of new full-time jobs totals twenty-five (25) or more; 2. the average employer wage is equal to or more than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the average state or county wage; and 3. all full-time employees are eligible for and offered health insurance coverage funded in whole or at least fifty percent (50%) by the qualified business or industry (or by a leasing company with respect to leased employees), then an additional thirty percent (30%) of the product derived by multiplying the average employer wage by the number of new full-time jobs; provided, however, that the initial mFlex tax incentive award amount determined by the authority and awarded on the project certification date shall be based upon estimates provided by the qualified business or industry to the authority with respect to paragraphs (a) through (d) of this section, which estimates shall be memorialized as project performance measures agreed to by the qualified business or industry in the mFlex agreement; provided, further, that such initial award amount shall be subject to any subsequent adjustments made by the authority pursuant to Section 57-114-13; (f)  To the extent that all or any portion of the purchases to establish a qualified economic development project which are financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq., the mFlex tax incentive determined in accordance with this section shall exclude the amount calculated in accordance with paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) above; provided that, this paragraph (f) shall not apply in determining the mFlex tax incentive for a qualified economic development project to the extent that (i) the qualified economic development project is an expansion of an existing project, (ii) all or any portion of the purchases to establish the existing project were financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq., and (iii) no purchases to establish the expansion constituting a qualified economic development project are financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-10-201 et seq. or Section 57-10-401 et seq. (2)  For a certified applicant with a qualified economic development project that: (a)  Is located within a qualified opportunity zone, the total amount of the initial mFlex incentive determined under subsection (1) of this section shall be multiplied by one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) and the product thereof shall be the total amount of the initial mFlex incentive determined and awarded by the authority to the certified applicant, instead of the amount determined under subsection (1) of this section; or (b)  Is located within a qualified opportunity zone and has at least five (5) new full-time jobs held by employees who reside within such qualified opportunity zone, the total amount of the initial mFlex incentive determined under subsection (1) of this section shall be multiplied by one hundred fifty percent (150%) and the product thereof shall be the total amount of the initial mFlex incentive determined and awarded by the authority to the certified applicant, instead of the amount determined under subsection (1) of this section.  For the purposes of this subsection (2), the term "qualified opportunity zone" means and has the same definition as such term has in 26 USC Section 1400Z-1. SECTION 2.  Section 57-114-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-114-13.  (1)  Unless its mFlex agreement prescribes a longer reporting period or additional reporting requirements, each qualified business or industry shall file an annual report with the authority for each qualified economic development project which has been certified, and for which any mFlex tax incentive has been awarded, by the authority in accordance with this chapter, for the longer of the following periods:  (a) until the reporting year during which all or any remaining portion of the mFlex tax incentive amount awarded to such qualified business or industry has been applied to offset state taxes, or (b) until the seventh reporting year, provided that an annual report shall in either instance be due in the final reporting year prescribed hereby or by the mFlex agreement.  Each annual report shall be due to the authority no later than the last business day of the month following the quarter during which the annual anniversary of its project certification date occurred.  Each annual report shall include the information set forth in this section, together with any other information required to be provided by the qualified business or industry pursuant to its mFlex agreement, for the immediately preceding twelve-month period ending on the last day of the month during which the annual anniversary of its project certification date occurred. (2)  Each annual report submitted to the authority by a qualified business or industry shall, at a minimum, contain the following information: (a)  The total qualified investment made between the project certification date through the end of the reporting year, including a breakout of actual expenditures made by the qualified business or industry for manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; (b)  The incremental qualified investment made during the reporting year, including a breakout of actual expenditures made by the qualified business or industry for manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials to establish and equip the qualified economic development project; (c)  If applicable, the total number of base full-time jobs; (d)  The total number of people employed in new full-time jobs as of the last day the year preceding the reporting year; (e)  The total number of people employed in new full-time jobs as of the last day the year of the reporting year; (f)  The average employer wage for the reporting year; (g)  The percentage and number, as of the last day of the reporting year, of new full-time employees who are eligible for and offered a health insurance coverage funded in whole or at least fifty percent (50%) by the qualified business or industry (or by a leasing company with respect to leased employees); (h)  A description of employee benefits, including but not limited to, health, dental and/or vision insurance, retirement savings account, etc. made available to employees, as well as a description of any employees to whom the benefits are not made available (e.g., part-time employees); (i)  The total amount of the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto, which the qualified business or industry has already applied and taken as a credit to offset state taxes through the end of the reporting period; (j)  A list of all affiliates of the qualified business or industry, including the Federal Employer Identification Number for each affiliate, for which any state tax liability thereof has been or is expected to be offset by all or some portion of the mFlex tax incentives awarded to the qualified business or industry, which list shall further identify (i) any affiliate of the qualified business or industry that was not disclosed as such on its application or annual report submitted for the prior reporting period, whichever was more recent, but which has either become an affiliate of the qualified business or industry as of the date the current annual report or which the qualified business or industry desires to utilize all or a portion of its mFlex tax incentive as a credit to offset the affiliate's state tax liability following the date of the current annual report; (ii) any change in the name of any previously disclosed affiliate since the date the qualified business or industry filed its application or annual report for the prior reporting period, whichever was more recent; (iii) any prior affiliate of the qualified business or industry disclosed as such on its application or annual report for the prior reporting period, whichever was more recent, and which is no longer an affiliate of the qualified business or industry as of the date the current annual report; and (iv) any affiliate of the qualified business or industry disclosed as such on its application or annual report for the prior reporting period, whichever was more recent, and which the qualified business or industry no longer desires that the affiliate utilize all or a portion of its mFlex tax incentive as a credit to offset the affiliate's state tax liability following the date of the current annual report. (3)  The authority shall prescribe a form or forms for the annual report. (4)  Notwithstanding the obligation of a qualified business or industry to file an annual report with the authority for each qualified economic development project which has been certified, and for which any mFlex tax incentive has been awarded, the authority is authorized to request from the qualified business or industry at any other time any of the information set forth herein that must be included in an annual report for purposes of determining whether a qualified business or industry has met any of the project performance measures set forth in its mFlex agreement on or before the respective deadlines imposed with respect thereto. Upon any such written request by the authority, the qualified business or industry shall, within thirty (30) days after receipt of the request, provide to the authority a certified copy of the information requested. (5)  If a qualified business or industry fails to either file an annual report with the authority on or before the deadline mandated by subsection (1) of this section, or provide any information requested by the authority pursuant to subsection (4) of this section within the time period mandated by such subsection, the authority shall provide written notice to the qualified business or industry of the failure to report, and the qualified business or industry shall have thirty (30) additional days to cure the reporting failure following its receipt of the notice.  If the qualified business or industry thereafter fails to file its annual report with the authority, or provide such information requested by the authority within the thirty-day-cure period, the authority is authorized to suspend or revoke, at the discretion thereof, all or a portion of the amount of the mFlex tax incentive previously awarded to the qualified business or industry for its qualified economic development project. (6)  If a qualified business or industry either fails to achieve or exceeds any project performance measure set forth in its mFlex agreement within or for any time period required by such agreement, the authority shall, following its (a) review of any annual report filed by the qualified business or industry or of any certified information provided by the qualified business or industry pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, and (b) verification based upon such information that the qualified business or industry either failed to achieve or exceeded any of the project performance measures set forth in its mFlex agreement within or for any time period required by such agreement, adjust the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto for its qualified economic development project such that the award is no longer based upon any one or more of the performance measures set forth in its mFlex agreement, but is instead based upon one or more of the following, as applicable, as of the end of the most recent reporting year for which the annual report was filed:  (a) the actual expenditures made by the qualified business or industry for purposes of the calculation prescribed by Section 57-114-9(1)(a), (b) and (c); and (b)(i) the actual number of new full-time jobs created by the qualified business or industry, together with (ii) the actual average employer wage associated therewith, for purposes of the calculations prescribed by Section 57-114-9(1)(d) and (e). (7)  A qualified business or industry and the authority may, at any time, amend or restate an mFlex agreement in order to modify the performance measures of the qualified business or industry with respect to its qualified economic development project, and in connection with such amendment or amendment and restatement, the authority shall modify the amount of the mFlex tax incentive awarded for the qualified economic development project to comport with the modified performance measures; provided that the modified award amount shall thereafter be subject to the adjustment requirements of subsection (6) of this section. (8)  If the authority adjusts any mFlex tax incentive award pursuant to subsection (6) or subsection (7) of this section, the authority shall issue an amended certification of the corresponding qualified economic development project, which shall specify the amount of mFlex tax incentive award adjustment.  The authority shall forward the amended certification, along with any other necessary information, to the Department of Revenue so that the mFlex tax incentive award adjustment for the qualified business or industry can be recorded by the Department of Revenue and used to verify each state tax credit subsequently applied by the qualified business or industry. (9)  If at any time the authority reduces the mFlex tax incentive award granted for the qualified economic development project to an amount less than the total amount of credits already applied and taken by the qualified business or industry, or by one or more affiliates thereof eligible to utilize such credit, to offset state taxes thereof, the Department of Revenue shall charge the qualified business or industry, or such affiliate or affiliates, with an assessment for the amount of state taxes for which no mFlex tax incentive is available, following such reduction by the authority, for application as a tax credit, beginning with those state taxes against which the qualified business or industry most recently applied the credit, and such state tax assessment shall be immediately due and payable. (10)  Any portion of an mFlex tax incentive awarded to the qualified business or industry by the authority for its qualified economic development project pursuant to this chapter that has not been applied, on or before the tenth annual anniversary of the project certificate date, as a credit by such qualified business or industry, or by one or more affiliates thereof eligible to utilize such credit, to offset state taxes otherwise payable, shall expire. (11)  Within thirty (30) days following the end of each calendar quarter, the authority shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a copy of each amendment to any certification made, together with a copy of each amendment to any mFlex agreement approved and executed, during the immediately preceding calendar quarter. SECTION 3.  Section 57-114-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-114-7.  (1)  The authority shall evaluate an application to determine whether the applicant's proposed project is a qualified economic development project and whether it is therefore eligible for an award by the authority of an mFlex tax incentive, as calculated in accordance with Section 57-114-9. (2)  Upon approval of an applicant's application, the authority shall issue a certification (a) designating the applicant's project as a "qualified economic development project" and eligible for the mFlex tax incentive authorized by this chapter; (b) awarding the initial mFlex tax incentive calculated pursuant to Section 57-114-9; and (c) imposing those mandatory conditions pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and any discretionary conditions otherwise imposed by the authority. (3)  Upon the issuance of the certification and execution of the mFlex agreement by a qualified business or industry and the authority, the qualified business or industry may apply the amount of its mFlex tax incentive as a credit to offset (a) any state taxes (except for withholding tax required to be deducted and withheld from employee wages pursuant to Section 27-7-301 et seq.), as incurred thereby, up to the full amount of the mFlex tax incentive awarded by the authority for the associated qualified economic development project, and (b) only up to twenty percent (20%) of the mFlex tax incentive amount may be applied as a credit during the course of any reporting year to offset withholding tax deducted and withheld from employee wages pursuant to Section 27-7-301 et seq.; provided that the amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset such state taxes shall be subject to any subsequent adjustments made by the authority to such award pursuant to Section 57-114-13, and any performance requirements set out in the mFlex agreement.  The amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes described in Section 57-114-3(bb)(i) shall be limited to those such taxes payable directly by the qualified business or industry to the Department of Revenue pursuant to a direct pay permit issued by the Department of Revenue under Section 27-65-93.  The amount of the mFlex tax incentive available to be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes may not be applied as a credit to offset any state taxes incurred prior to the issuance of the certification by the authority and execution of the mFlex agreement by the qualified business or industry and the authority. (4)  The following conditions shall apply to each such certification made, and each mFlex tax incentive awarded, by the authority in accordance with this chapter: (a)  Any certification and mFlex tax incentive award issued by the authority under this chapter is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other person or business or tax account without prior approval by the authority, except for one or more affiliates of the qualified business or industry disclosed thereby on its application or in a subsequent annual report submitted to the authority in accordance with this chapter; (b)  No qualified business or industry may claim or use the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto under this chapter unless the qualified business or industry is in full compliance with all state and local tax laws, and related ordinances, permits and other applicable governmental approvals; and (c)  Each qualified business or industry must enter into an mFlex agreement with the authority which sets out, at a minimum, (i) the obligation of the business or industry to provide an annual report to the authority pursuant to Section 57-114-13 that demonstrates the actual amount of its qualified investment, including actual expenditures on manufacturing machinery, nonmanufacturing equipment and component building materials, the number of new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the project, and any other relevant information as may be required by the authority; and (ii) terms for readjustment or recapture of all or a portion of the mFlex tax incentive awarded thereto pursuant to Section 57-114-13 if the applicant 1. fails to satisfy the minimum job creation requirement if certification of the project is predicated on satisfaction of the minimum job creation requirement and not the minimum qualified investment, or 2. fails to satisfy the minimum qualified investment if certification of the project is predicated on satisfaction of the minimum job creation requirement and not the minimum qualified investment, and/or 3. fails to otherwise satisfy any other additional performance requirements of the qualified business or industry or its qualified economic development project that are imposed by the authority. (5)  In addition to those mandatory conditions prescribed by this chapter that apply to each certification and award of an mFlex tax incentive made by the authority in accordance herewith, the authority is authorized to impose any other conditions upon any certification and award of an mFlex tax incentive made by the authority as it shall find best promotes economic development in the state. (6)  Upon certifying a qualified business or industry as eligible for, and awarding, an mFlex tax incentive under this chapter, the authority shall forward the certification along with any other necessary information to the Department of Revenue so that the mFlex tax incentive awarded to the qualified business or industry can be recorded by the Department of Revenue and used to verify each state tax credit subsequently applied by the qualified business or industry. (7)  Within thirty (30) days following the end of each calendar quarter, the authority shall provide to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a copy of each certification made, together with a copy of each mFlex agreement approved and executed, during the immediately preceding calendar quarter. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.